Utah statutes.
63C-9-701.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Agency" means each agency, authority, board, bureau, commission, committee, corporation, council, department, division, fund, institution, laboratory, library, office, officer, panel, unit, or other administrative unit of the state.

(2)  "Art" includes paintings, decorative paintings, historic light fixtures, murals, photographs, pottery, sculpture, textiles, monuments, memorials, and other visual and decorative arts.

(3)  "Exhibit" means a static visual explanatory or educational presentation.

(4)  "Public area" means any area either inside or outside any building on capitol hill under the jurisdiction of the board under Subsection 63C-9-301(1)(a) that is:

(a)  open to the public; and

(b)  not part of the offices of any government agency.

(5)  "Subcommittee" means the Art Placement Subcommittee of the State Capitol Preservation Board created in this part.

